Washington statutes.
RCW 35.27.190

Effect of consolidation of offices.

Upon the consolidation of the office of treasurer with that of clerk, the office of treasurer shall be abolished and the clerk shall exercise all the powers and perform all the duties required by statute or ordinance to be performed by the treasurer; in the execution of any papers his or her designation as clerk shall be sufficient.

Upon the consolidation of the office of clerk with that of treasurer, the treasurer shall exercise all the powers vested in and perform all the duties required to be performed by the clerk.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2059; 1965 c 7 s 35.27.190. Prior: (i) 1945 c 58 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 9177-2. (ii) 1945 c 58 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 9177-3.]